src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_rcp_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:siidogena' EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:siidogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProxSubj+3PlProxObj:siidogenag EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+XSubj+XObj:siimwaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj+3PlProxObj:siigwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:siiwa' EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProxSubj+3PlProxObj:siiwag EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+XSubj+XObj:siim EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:siibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:siibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:siibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProxSubj+3PlProxObj:siibaneg EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProxSubj+3PlProxObj:siibaniig EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+XSubj+XObj:siimwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:dogena' EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:widogena' EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:widogenan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProxSubj+3PlProxObj:dogenag EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProxSubj+3PlProxObj:widogenag EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+XSubj+XObj:mwaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj+3PlProxObj:gwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:wa' EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj+3PlProxObj:wag EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+XSubj+XObj:m EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:V1banen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:V1banii' EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj+3PlObvObj:V1baniin EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+3PlProxObj:V1baneg EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj+3PlProxObj:V1baniig EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+XSubj+XObj:mwaaban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_rcp                                        !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NI                                          !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_rcp_Flags_Prefix=NI
@U.Order.Ind@ VAI_Class=VAI_rcp_Prefix=NI_Order=Ind_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_rcp, Prefix: NI, Order: Ind                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_rcp_Prefix=NI_Order=Ind_Endings
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+ExclSubj+ExclObj:siiminaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+ExclSubj+ExclObj:siimin EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+ExclSubj+ExclObj:siiminaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+ExclSubj+ExclObj:minaadog EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj+ExclObj:min EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj+ExclObj:minaaban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_rfx                                        !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary
0:%>%> VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_rfx                                        !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_rfx                                        !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_rfx, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj              !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Stems
aaboodizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
aanawenindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
aanji'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
aanjinikaanidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
aapawandizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
aapijinikeshkodaadizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
aazhawibii'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
abininjiiyaabaawanidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
abizodizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
agaji'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
agazondizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
agobinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
agwaakozide'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
agwanaate'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
akwaakadizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
anaamenindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
andookomaanidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
anokii'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
apiitenindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
ashandizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
atamaadizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
ayeko'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
ayikwanagwenidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
baapaawa'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
baapaawega'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
baapi'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
baataa'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
babaama'oonidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
badagiingwebinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
badaka'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
badakizide'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bajiishka'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bakandizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bamenindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bapasidoone'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bapasininjii'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bashkobiisodizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
basidoone'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
basinjii'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bengwaanikwe'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
beshibii'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bichiboonidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bichizhodizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
biichikonaye'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
biidamadizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
biijaabibinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
biindiganidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
biini'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
biinisidinimaanganeshkodaadizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
biinjaabibinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
biinjidenigomebinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
biinjisheyaabaawanidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
biitazhigane'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
binaakwe'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bitaaganaandizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bitizhodizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
bizinaadenindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
boozazhenidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
boozinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
daanginidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
daataagozide'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
dagwenindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
dakobaawanidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
dasoonidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
datagozide'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
datagwaakozide'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
dazhwaanikwe'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
debwewenindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
dibaabandizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
dibaajindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
didibanagwenidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
dipaabaawanidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
dookinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gaagiishkigidigwezhodizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gaanidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gaashkibaanidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gaasiidoone'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gadiskaakonidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gagaanoonidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gagwedinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
ganawaabandizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gashkaabowe'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gibiingwenidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gibishenidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gibitenidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gibwashkidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gidimaagenindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gidiskaakonidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
giige'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
giishkigaadezhodizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
giishkizhodizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
giiweba'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
giizhootawagebinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
ginagazhebinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
giziidoone'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
godagi'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
gopazondizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
ikonagwenidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
inigaa'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
izhinaago'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
jiichiigibinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
jiikindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
maawanjitamaadizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
mamiigwaabibinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
manaaji'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
miigaanidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
mikaadizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
minomaago'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
minwanjige'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
mookondizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
naaba'anidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
naanaazhaanikwenidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
nagaji'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
naniizaani'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
nibaadaajindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
nitamaadizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
ondaaji'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
oshkikonaye'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
ozhobii'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
wayezhindizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
wiindamaadizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
wiisini'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
zagaakwa'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
zegi'idizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
zhaashagininjiibinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
zhingwena'odizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
ziiginiingwaanidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
zinigogaadebinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
zinigojiibinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
zinigoshkiinzhigwebinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
zinigozidenidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
zinigwiingwebinidizo VAI_Class=VAI_rfx_Boundary ;
